Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.150

Reinstatement.

A person whose license has been suspended under this chapter may petition the disciplining authority for reinstatement after an interval as determined by the disciplining authority in the order unless the disciplining authority has found, pursuant to RCW 18.130.160, that the licensee can never be rehabilitated or can never regain the ability to practice with reasonable skill and safety. The disciplining authority shall hold hearings on the petition and may deny the petition or may order reinstatement and impose terms and conditions as provided in RCW 18.130.160 and issue an order of reinstatement. The disciplining authority may require successful completion of an examination as a condition of reinstatement.

A person whose license has been suspended for noncompliance with a support order or visitation order under RCW 74.20A.320 may petition for reinstatement at any time by providing the secretary a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, the secretary shall automatically reissue the person's license upon receipt of the release, and payment of a reinstatement fee, if any.

[ 2008 c 134 s 22; 1997 c 58 s 831; 1984 c 279 s 15.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.